California statutes. Water Code
No district furnishing water for residential use to a tenant shall seek to recover any charges or penalties for the furnishing of water to or for the tenant’s residential use from any subsequent tenant on account of nonpayment of charges by a previous tenant. The district may, however, require that service to subsequent tenants be furnished on the account of the landlord or property owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1251, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

31008.

A district may provide for the pension of officers or employees and the creation of a special fund for the purpose of paying such pension and the accumulation of contributions to said fund from the revenues of the district, the wages of officers or employees, voluntary contributions, gifts, donations, or any source of revenue, not inconsistent with the general powers of the board, and may contract with any insurance corporation or any other insurance carrier for the establishment and maintenance of group insurance, a system of group annuities, and a pension service for such officers and employees, and may provide for the terms and conditions under which such pensions, group insurance, or group annuities shall be allowed, and for the time and extent of service of officers or employees before such pensions, group insurance, or group annuities shall be available to them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1375.)
-------------------------------------------

31009.

In any district authorized to provide fire protection services, the district board is authorized to enforce the provisions of Sections 4291 to 4296, inclusive, of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1013.)
-------------------------------------------

31010.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 1450) of Division 2 of the Streets and Highways Code, any district and any county may enter into a contract agreeing to pay and apportion between them the costs of locating, removing, repairing, or relocating any facilities owned or to be owned by either party on the roads or other property of the other in such proportion and upon such terms as the governing boards of the parties shall determine to be equitable.

This section shall not supersede the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 7030) of Division 4 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------

31011.

A district may disseminate information to the public concerning the rights, properties, and activities of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 330.)
-------------------------------------------

31012.

If, on or after the effective date of this section, substantially all of a district water system is acquired by another public agency by any method other than a vote of the electorate of that district so authorizing, the following provisions shall apply:

(a) All funds derived from the operation of the former district system shall be separately accounted for and used exclusively for the purposes of maintenance, operation, betterments, and bond debt service of the acquired system.

(b) No funds derived from the former district system shall be used for any other such purpose until all debt of that former system has been paid in full or until a majority vote of the electorate of the area served by that former system has authorized such other expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

31013.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mammoth County Water District may operate a propane gas distribution service for residents of the district and may do any act necessary to furnish sufficient propane gas to residents of the district.

The provisions of this section are necessary because of the great need for propane gas service within the area of the Mammoth County Water District. There is no other local governmental entity willing to provide such service to the people of the district. This problem is not common to all districts formed under this division. It is therefore hereby declared that a general law cannot be made applicable and that the enactment of this section as a special law is necessary for the solution of problems existing in the Mammoth County Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

31013.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mammoth Community Water District may acquire property and construct, maintain, operate, sell, and lease facilities, including, but not limited to, wells, plants, and pipes for the distribution of heated water or steam, that are necessary to develop, extract, and distribute geothermal water resources in order to provide space heating for buildings and other facilities within the boundaries of the district.

(b) The district may finance the acquisition of property and the construction of facilities under this section by utilizing the same financing methods that are available to the district under this division to finance water facilities.

(c) The powers granted by other provisions of this division may be exercised by the district in connection with the authority granted to the district under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 166, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

31014.

Subject to the consent of the governing body of the county or city having jurisdiction over the highway or street, the Juniper-Riviera County Water District may open, widen, extend, straighten, surface, or otherwise improve and maintain, in whole or in part, that highway or street, as the case may be, in such district.

This special provision is necessary because of special circumstances in the area served by the Juniper-Riviera County Water District. This area is located in a sparsely populated desert area, and the people of the county have an urgent and immediate need for improved and maintained roads within the boundaries of this county water district. The people of the county would be substantially benefited by having road improvement and maintenance provided by the existing district instead of by the formation of other and additional districts. It is, therefore, hereby declared that a general law cannot be made applicable and that this enactment is necessary for the solution of problems within the Juniper-Riviera County Water District.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 583.)
-------------------------------------------

31014.5.

The term “irrigation district” as used in Chapter 1046 of the Statutes of 1969 includes a county water district and the Orange County Water District.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 31014 by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

31015.

The Sierra Lakes County Water District shall not exercise any of the powers and purposes set forth in Article 7 (commencing with Section 31120), Article 8 (commencing with Section 31130), and Article 9 (commencing with Section 31135).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1652, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

31016.

(a) In order to enforce the provisions of any ordinance of the district, including an ordinance fixing charges for the furnishing of commodities or services, the district may correct any violation of an ordinance of the district. The district may also petition the superior court for the issuance of a preliminary or permanent injunction, or both, as may be appropriate, restraining any person from the continued violation of any ordinance of the district or for the issuance of an order stopping or disconnecting a service if the charges for that service are unpaid at the time specified in the ordinance.

(b) The district may enter upon the private property of any person within the jurisdiction of the district in order to investigate possible violations of an ordinance of the district. The investigation shall be made with consent of the owner or tenant of the property or, if consent is refused, with a warrant duly issued pursuant to the procedures set forth in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that, notwithstanding Section 1822.52 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the warrant shall be issued only upon probable cause.

(c) The district shall notify the county or city building inspector, county health inspector, or other affected county or city employee or office, in writing, within a reasonable time if an actual violation of a district, city, or county ordinance is discovered during the investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 798, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Water [31020. - 31035.1.]

31020.

A district may do any act necessary to furnish sufficient water in the district for any present or future beneficial use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31021.

A district may store water for the benefit of the district, conserve water for future use, and appropriate, acquire, and conserve water and water rights for any useful purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31022.

A district may operate water rights, works, property, rights, and privileges useful or necessary to convey, supply, store, or make use of water for any purpose authorized by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31023.

A district may sell water or the use thereof for any useful purpose and whenever there is a surplus, dispose of the surplus to municipalities, public agencies, or consumers located without the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31024.

A district may establish rules and regulations for the sale, distribution, and use of water and may therein provide that water shall not be furnished to persons against whom there are delinquent water rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31025.

The district shall fix and through the general manager collect the water rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 274.)
-------------------------------------------

31026.

A district shall have the power to restrict the use of district water during any emergency caused by drought, or other threatened or existing water shortage, and to prohibit the wastage of district water or the use of district water during such periods, for any purpose other than household uses or such other restricted uses as may be determined to be necessary by the district and may prohibit use of such water during such periods for specific uses which the district may from time to time find to be nonessential.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 622.)
-------------------------------------------

31027.

(a) A district may prescribe and define by ordinance the restrictions, prohibitions, and exclusions. Every such ordinance shall be in full force and effect immediately upon adoption, but shall be published once in full in a newspaper of general circulation, printed, published and circulated in the district within 10 days after adoption, or if there be no such newspaper it shall be posted within 10 days after adoption in three public places within the district.

(b) The publication of ordinances, as required by subdivision (a), may be satisfied by either of the following actions:

(1) The district may publish a summary of a proposed ordinance or proposed amendment to an existing ordinance. The summary shall be prepared by an official designated by the board. A summary shall be published and a certified copy of the full text of the proposed ordinance or proposed amendment shall be posted in the office of the board at least five days prior to the board meeting at which the proposed ordinance or amendment or alteration thereto is to be adopted. Within 15 days after adoption of the ordinance or amendment, the board shall publish a summary of the ordinance or amendment with the names of those directors voting for and against the ordinance or amendment and the official shall post in the office of the board a certified copy of the full text of the adopted ordinance or amendment along with the names of those directors voting for and against the ordinance or amendment.

(2) If the official designated by the board determines that it is not feasible to prepare a fair and adequate summary of the proposed or adopted ordinance or amendment, and if the board so orders, a display advertisement of at least one-quarter of a page in a newspaper of general circulation in the county shall be published at least five days prior to the board meeting at which the proposed ordinance or amendment or alteration thereto is to be adopted. Within 15 days after adoption of the ordinance or amendment, a display advertisement of at least one-quarter of a page shall be published. The advertisement shall indicate the general nature of, and provide information about, the proposed or adopted ordinance or amendment, including information sufficient to enable the public to obtain copies of the complete text of the ordinance or amendment, and the names of those directors voting for and against the ordinance or amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 553, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31028.

A district shall have power to make findings upon each and all of the matters referred to in Section 31026. A finding by the board of directors upon the existence, threat or duration of an emergency or shortage or upon the matter of necessity or any other matter or condition shall be made by resolution or ordinance, and shall be prima facie evidence of the fact or matter so found, and such fact or matter shall be presumed to continue unchanged unless and until a contrary finding shall have been made by the board by resolution or ordinance. Such finding shall be received in evidence in any civil or criminal proceeding in which it may be offered, and shall be proof and evidence of the fact or matter found until rebutted or overcome by other sufficient evidence received in such proceeding. Copy of any resolution or ordinance setting forth any finding shall, when certified by the secretary of the district, be evidence that the finding was made by the district as shown by the resolution or ordinance and certification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 622.)
-------------------------------------------

31029.

After the publication or posting of any ordinance as provided in Section 31027, it is a misdemeanor for any person to use or apply water received from the district contrary to or in violation of the restriction or prohibition, until the ordinance has been repealed or the emergency or threatened emergency has ceased, and, upon conviction thereof, that person shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 30 days or by fine of not more than six hundred dollars ($600), or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 214.)
-------------------------------------------

31029.1.

(a) An ordinance to require water conservation and to prevent waste which is adopted by a district which includes territory in Monterey County may provide that violation is an infraction or nuisance. A violation may be prosecuted in the name of the people of the State of California, or redressed by civil action.

(b) Every violation determined to be an infraction shall be punishable pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 36900 of the Government Code.

(c) For any violation declared to be a nuisance, the ordinance may provide for the summary abatement of the nuisance, and may provide for the initiation of civil proceedings to abate the nuisance. The ordinance may provide that any person committing a nuisance shall be liable for the costs incurred by the district to abate the nuisance, including, but not limited to, the costs of investigation, costs of time and materials expended to eliminate or mitigate the nuisance, court costs, attorneys’ fees, and costs of monitoring compliance. The ordinance may further establish civil penalties that may be assessed by a court against persons found by the court to have committed a nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 25.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

31030.

(a) The Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) is applicable to districts for the purpose of providing funds for the acquisition, construction, improving or financing of any public improvement authorized by this division which is not inconsistent with the provisions of Section 54310 of the Government Code. However, notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 54382, 54400, and 54402 of the Government Code and any other provisions of law, the board may determine and provide, in any resolution providing for the issuance of such revenue bonds, for the following:

(1) For maturity dates of the bonds not exceeding 50 years from their respective dates.

(2) If, before the issuance of the bonds, the board determines, to the best of its knowledge and belief, that the interest on the bonds will be subject to federal income taxation under then existing law, for interest on the bonds at a rate or rates not exceeding 10 percent a year, payable annually or semiannually.

(b) The powers conferred upon districts by this section are in addition to the powers conferred by Article 7 (commencing with Section 31480) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of this division and none of the provisions of such Article 7 are applicable to proceedings taken by a district pursuant to this section.

(c) The board may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 on behalf of any portion of the district created as an improvement district pursuant to this division and any election for the issuance of such revenue bonds shall be limited to the area of such improvement district. If revenue bonds are so issued on behalf of an improvement district:

(1) No proceeds of such revenue bonds shall be used to finance public improvements to provide service outside the service area of the improvement district.

(2) Only revenues which are derived from rates or charges for the providing of service within the service area of the improvement district shall be pledged to or used to pay such revenue bonds.

(d) As used in this section, the words “service area of the improvement district” are defined to mean the territory of the improvement district as it existed at the time of the bond election plus lands outside the improvement district, if any, being served at the time of the bond election by the improvement district facilities plus additional territory, if any, annexed to the improvement district as the same existed at the time of the bond election, not exceeding in the aggregate 40 percent by area of the improvement district as the same existed at the time of the bond election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1480.)
-------------------------------------------

31031.

A district may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix, on or before the first day of July in each calendar year, a water standby or availability charge. The water standby or availability charge shall not exceed ten dollars ($10) per acre per year for each acre of land, or ten dollars ($10) per year for each parcel of land less than an acre within the district to which water is made available for any purpose by the district, whether the water is actually used or not, unless the standby charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The board of directors of a district which fixes such a charge may establish schedules varying such charge according to the land uses and the degree of availability or quantity of use of such water to the affected lands, and may restrict such charge to lands lying within one or more improvement districts within such district. If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby or immediate availability charge was established were followed, the board of directors may, by resolution, continue the charge in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the board shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

31031.6.

Notwithstanding Sections 31031 and 31032.1 in the Coachella Valley Water District, the water standby or availability charge or assessment shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per acre per year for land on which the charge or assessment is levied, or thirty dollars ($30) per year for a parcel less than one acre.

This section applicable only to the Coachella Valley Water District is necessary because of the unique and special water management and financing problems of the area included within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 564, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

31031.7.

Notwithstanding Sections 31031 and 31032.1, the water standby or availability charge or assessment in the Twentynine Palms Water District shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per acre per year for land on which the charge or assessment is levied or thirty dollars ($30) per year for a parcel less than one acre.

This section, applicable only to the Twentynine Palms Water District, is necessary because of the unique and special water management and financing problems of the area included within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 279, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31031.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the Tuolumne Regional Water District may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix, levy, and collect a water standby or availability charge. The water standby or availability charge shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per acre per year for each acre of land, or thirty dollars ($30) per year for each parcel of land less than an acre, to which water is made available for any purpose by the district, unless the standby charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the Tuolumne Regional Water District may, by a four-fifths vote of the members of the board of directors, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the board shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

31032.

In case any water standby charge remains unpaid on the first day of the month before the month in which the board of supervisors of the county in which the district or any part thereof is located is required by law to levy the amount of taxes required for county purposes, a 6 percent penalty thereon shall accrue. The amount of the unpaid standby charge plus the said penalty shall be added to and become a part of the annual tax levied upon the land to which water for which the standby charge is unpaid was available and same shall constitute a lien on that land.

If a district collects taxes pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 31700) of Part 7 of this division, the amount of tax attributable to unpaid water standby charges, and the penalty thereon, shall be stated on the tax bill separately from all other taxes.

If a district collects taxes pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 31730) of Part 7 of this division, it shall provide each person whose property is subject to taxation for unpaid water standby charges, and the penalty thereon, with a tax bill stating the amount of such charges and penalty separately.

In such case and at least fifteen (15) days before the first day of the month in which said board of supervisors is required by law to levy the amount of taxes required for county purposes, the board of directors of the district shall furnish in writing to the board of supervisors and to the county auditor, respectively, a description of each and every parcel of land within the district upon which a standby charge remains unpaid, together with the amount of said unpaid charge plus said penalty on each said parcel of land. Whenever land in two or more counties is included in a district, the board of directors of the district shall furnish in writing to the board of supervisors and to the county auditor of each of said counties, respectively, a description of each and every parcel within said county upon which a standby charge remains unpaid, together with the amount of said unpaid standby charge plus penalty thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 674.)
-------------------------------------------

31032.1.

A district may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix, as an alternative to the charge prescribed by Section 31031, in each fiscal year, water standby or availability assessments of not to exceed thirty dollars ($30) per acre per year for each acre of land, or thirty dollars ($30) per year for each parcel of land less than an acre within the district to which water is made available for any purpose by the district, whether the water is actually used or not, unless the standby charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The board of directors of a district that fixes the assessment may establish schedules varying the assessment according to the land uses and the degree of availability or quantity of use of water to the affected lands, and may restrict the assessment to lands lying within one or more improvement districts within the district. If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the board of directors may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the board shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

A district may elect to have the assessments for the fiscal year collected on the tax roll in the same manner, by the same persons and at the same time as, together with and not separately from, its general taxes. In that event, it shall cause a written report to be prepared and filed with the secretary which report shall contain a description of each parcel of real property and the amount of the assessment for each parcel for the year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

31032.2.

The secretary shall cause notice of the filing of the report and of a time and place of hearing thereon to be published, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, prior to the date set for hearing, in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, if there is one and if not then in such paper printed and published in the county, and shall cause a notice in writing of the filing of the report to be mailed to each person to whom any parcel or parcels of real property described in such report is assessed in the last equalized assessment roll available on the date the report is prepared, at the address shown on the assessment roll or as known to the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

31032.3.

At the time stated in the notice, the board shall hear and consider all objections or protests, if any, to the report referred to in the notice and may continue the hearing from time to time. Upon the conclusion of the hearing, the board may adopt, revise, change, reduce or modify an assessment or overrule any or all objections. The board shall make its determination upon each assessment as described in the report which determination shall be final. The board may make appropriate adjustments that may be necessary as a result of the equalization of the assessment roll subsequent to the filing of the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

31032.4.

On or before the 10th day of August of each year following such final determination, the secretary shall file with the county auditor a copy of the report with a statement endorsed thereon over his signature that it has been finally adopted by the board and the auditor shall enter the amounts of the assessment against the respective lots or parcels of land as they appear on the current assessment roll. If a district collects taxes pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 31730), Part 7 of this division, the secretary shall file the report with the collector.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 427.)
-------------------------------------------

31032.5.

The amount of the assessments shall constitute a lien against the lot or parcel of land against which the assessment has been imposed as of noon on the first Monday in March immediately preceding the date of levy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

31032.6.

The county tax collector or district collector shall include the amount of the assessments on bills for taxes levied against the respective lots and parcels of land. Thereafter the amount of the assessments shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner and by the same persons as, together with and not separately from, the general taxes for the district, and shall be delinquent at the same time and thereafter be subject to the same delinquency penalties. All laws applicable to the levy, collection and enforcement of general taxes of the district, including, but not limited to, those pertaining to the matters of delinquency, correction, cancellation, refund and redemption, are applicable to such assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

31032.7.

In the event a district does not elect to collect such assessments with the general taxes of the district, it may issue separate bills payable in the time and manner designated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

31032.8.

A district may provide for a basic penalty of not more than 6 percent for nonpayment of the assessment within the time and in the manner prescribed by it, and in addition may provide for a penalty of not exceeding one-half of 1 percent per month for nonpayment of the assessment and basic penalty. It may provide for collection of the penalties herein provided for.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

31032.9.

Any district may make the election specified in Section 31032.1 with respect only to delinquent assessments and may do so by preparing and filing the written report, giving notice and holding the hearing therein required only as to such delinquencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

31032.10.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the Yorba Linda County Water District may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix, in each fiscal year, within Improvement District No. 2 of the district, water standby or availability assessments of not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per year for (1) each acre or portion thereof or, in the alternative, (2) each residential unit, or the equivalent thereof as to property designated for other than residential purposes, not to exceed the maximum number of residential units or the equivalent thereof established in the General Plan for the property within Improvement District No. 2 adopted by the City of Yorba Linda on June 1, 1981, regardless of any amendment or revision of the General Plan, whether or not a residential unit or the equivalent thereof is actually constructed and whether the water is actually used or not. The Board of Directors of the Yorba Linda County Water District shall establish schedules varying the assessment according to the land uses and the degree of availability or quantity of use of the water to the affected lands within Improvement District No. 2. If the assessment is to be collected on the basis of units, the written consent of the owner of the property to be assessed on the basis of units shall be obtained.

(b) The Yorba Linda County Water District may elect to have the assessments authorized by subdivision (a) for the fiscal year collected on the tax roll in the same manner, by the same persons, and at the same time as, and together with and not separately from, county taxes. In that event, the district shall prepare a written report which shall be filed with the secretary. The report shall contain a description of each parcel of real property and the amount of the assessment for each parcel for the year. If the assessment is to be assessed on a residential unit or equivalent basis as described in subdivision (a), the assessment for each assessor’s parcel shall be determined by multiplying the estimated number of residential units or the equivalent thereof proposed at that time for the assessor’s parcel by the proposed amount per residential unit as shown in the assessor’s parcels in Improvement District No. 2 for the particular fiscal year.

(c) The water standby or availability assessment authorized by this section shall not be imposed on any subdivided parcel upon which there exists a residential unit which has been connected to domestic water facilities of the Yorba Linda County Water District.

(d) If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby or availability assessment was established were followed, the district may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the district shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(e) This section shall have no force or effect after January 1, 1989, except to the extent necessary to raise funds for interest or principal payments on bonds of Improvement District No. 2 issued prior to such date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Inoperative after January 1, 1989, with exception, as provided in subd. (e).)
-------------------------------------------

31032.12.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the Yorba Linda County Water District may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix, in each fiscal year, within Improvement District No. 1 of the district, water standby or availability assessments of not to exceed ninety dollars ($90) per year for each acre or portion thereof, unless the standby charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The Board of Directors of the Yorba Linda County Water District may vary the assessment according to the land uses and the degree of availability or quantity of use of water upon the affected lands within Improvement District No. 1.

(b) The Yorba Linda County Water District may elect to have the assessments authorized by subdivision (a) for the fiscal year collected on the tax roll in the same manner, by the same persons, and at the same time, as, and together with and not separately from, county taxes. In that event, the district shall prepare a written report which shall be filed with the secretary. The report shall contain a description of each parcel of real property and the amount of the assessment for each parcel for the year.

(c) The water standby or availability assessment authorized by this section shall not be imposed on any subdivided parcel with respect to which building permits have been issued prior to March 1 of each year or which has been connected to domestic water facilities of the Yorba Linda County Water District prior to July 1 of each year.

(d) If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the board of directors may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the board shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(e) The purpose of this section is to provide a method whereby the Yorba Linda County Water District may more fairly allocate the cost of providing capital water facilities among the lands and present and future inhabitants of Improvement District No. 1 according to the benefit received. Accordingly, the proceeds of the assessment authorized by subdivision (a) shall be used only: (1) to supplement the proceeds of the ad valorem property tax levied by the Yorba Linda County Water District within Improvement District No. 1 to pay debt service on the Series A and Series B 1978 Water Bonds and additional general obligation bonded indebtedness, not to exceed the amount of five million dollars ($5,000,000), of the Improvement District No. 1; and (2) to pay the cost of the proceedings incurred pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

31033.

A district may drain and reclaim lands within the district either by surface or underground works or both; and may acquire, by appropriation or other lawful means, and divert, store, conserve, transport or dispose of water resulting from such operations; and may acquire, by appropriation or other lawful means, and divert, store, conserve, transport or dispose of flood and storm water within the district, and flood and storm water of streams or watercourses outside of the district which flow into the district, for any beneficial purpose or use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1565.)
-------------------------------------------

31034.

If a public utility subject to the control and regulation of the Public Utilities Commission petitions the Public Utilities Commission to extend its water service or to establish water service within a district or any area served by a district, prior to acting on the petition the Public Utilities Commission shall notify the district of such petition where the district has previously filed with the public Utilities Commission a request to be notified of such petitions which request contains a description of the boundaries of the district and any area outside of the district boundaries which is served by the district.
